Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB807.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The General Assembly finds and declares that there is a compelling State interest to protect older adults from abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment. To further this interest, it is necessary to establish an Older Adult Abuse Registry to document incidents of abuse and prohibit individuals who have harmed older adults from being employed in settings serving vulnerable populations. Maintaining such records is 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 essential to public safety and justifiably outweighs competing privacy concerns, as limited and regulated disclosure plays a critical role in safeguarding older adults from harm.Section 2. Section 305 of the act of November 6, 1987 (P.L.381, No.79), known as the Older Adults Protective Services Act, is amended to read:Section 305. Immunity from civil and criminal liability.In the absence of willful misconduct or gross negligence, the agency, the director, employees of the agency, protective services workers or employees of the department shall not be civilly or criminally liable for any decision or action or resulting consequence of decisions or action when acting under and according to the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 9.Section 3. Section 702(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 702. Reports to department and coroner.(a) Department.--* * *(3) Beginning upon the establishment of the Older Adult Abuse Registry, upon receipt of a report under paragraph (1), the department shall place the name of the alleged perpetrator who is an employee on the Older Adult Abuse Registry as provided for under Chapter 9.* * *Section 4. Section 704(b) of the act is amended to read:Section 704. Restrictions on employees.* * *(b) [Prohibition] Suspension and termination.--(1) Upon the filing of criminal charges against an employee, the Commonwealth agency which licenses the facility 20260SB0807PN1823 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall order the facility to immediately [prohibit that employee from having access to recipients at the facility. If that employee is a director, operator, administrator or supervisor, that employee shall be subject to restrictions deemed appropriate by the Commonwealth agency which licenses the facility to assure the safety of recipients of the facility.] suspend the employee and, if convicted, terminate the employee.(2) Upon accessing the Older Adult Abuse Registry under section 903(a)(2), if a facility or temporary health care services agency finds that a current employee has a profile on the registry, the facility shall terminate the employee.Section 5. Section 705(a), (c) and (e) of the act are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 705. Confidentiality of and access to confidential reports.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b) and Chapter 9, a report under this chapter shall be confidential.(b) Exceptions.--A report under this chapter shall be made available to all of the following:* * *(11) The department as provided for under Chapter 9.(c) Excision of certain names.--[The] Except as provided under Chapter 9, the name of the person suspected of committing the abuse shall be excised from a report made available under subsection (b)(4), (5) and (10).* * *(e) Protecting identity of person making report.--Except as provided under Chapter 9 and for reports to law enforcement 20260SB0807PN1823 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officials, the release of data that would identify the individual who made a report under this chapter or an individual who cooperated in a subsequent investigation is prohibited. Law enforcement officials shall treat all reporting sources as confidential information.Section 6. Section 706 of the act is amended to read:Section 706. Penalties.(a) Administrative.--(1) An administrator who intentionally or willfully fails to comply or obstructs compliance with the provisions of this chapter or who intimidates or commits a retaliatory act against an employee who complies in good faith with the provisions of this chapter commits a violation of this chapter and shall be subject to an administrative penalty under paragraph (3).(2) A facility owner that intentionally or willfully fails to comply with or obstructs compliance with this chapter or that intimidates or commits a retaliatory act against an employee who complies in good faith with this chapter commits a violation of this chapter and shall be subject to an administrative penalty under paragraph (3).(3) The Commonwealth agency or Commonwealth agencies which regulate the facility have jurisdiction to determine violations of this chapter and may issue an order assessing a civil penalty of not more than [$2,500] $10,000. An order under this paragraph is subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(b) Criminal.--20260SB0807PN1823 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An administrator who intentionally or willfully fails to comply or obstructs compliance with this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the [third] second degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of [$2,500] $10,000 or to imprisonment for not more than [one year] two years, or both.(2) A facility owner that intentionally or willfully fails to comply with or obstructs compliance with this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the [third] second degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of [$2,500] $10,000 or to imprisonment for not more than [one year] two years, or both.(c) Penalties for failure to report.--A person required under this chapter to report a case of suspected abuse who willfully fails to do so commits a [summary offense] misdemeanor of the second degree for the first violation and a [misdemeanor] felony of the third degree for a second or subsequent violation.Section 7. The act is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 9OLDER ADULT ABUSE REGISTRYSection 901. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Crime against a recipient." The commission of any of the following offenses where the victim is a recipient and the perpetrator is an employee:(1) An offense under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 27 (relating to assault).(2) An offense under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 31 (relating to 20260SB0807PN1823 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sexual offenses).(3) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701 (relating to robbery).(4) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3922.1 (relating to financial exploitation of an older adult or care-dependent person)."Recipient abuse." The alleged or substantiated abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment of a recipient by an employee."Registry." The Older Adult Abuse Registry established under section 902."Temporary health care services agency." A person engaged for hire in the business of providing or procuring temporary employment in facilities.Section 902. Older Adult Abuse Registry.(a) Establishment and administration.--(1) The department shall establish the Older Adult Abuse Registry within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph. Upon establishment, the department shall transmit notice of the establishment to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The department shall operate and maintain the registry, including a case file and a profile for each individual meeting the criteria for placement on the registry, or shall enter into a contract with a third-party entity for the operation and maintenance of the registry.(b) Access to profiles.--The department shall establish a procedure to provide administrators of facilities and temporary health care services agencies with continuous access to profiles on the registry through the use of log-in credentials.(c) Criteria for profile.--The registry shall include a 20260SB0807PN1823 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 profile for individuals who:(1) Are the subject of a protective report under section 302(a) pending investigation.(2) Are the subject of a substantiated report under section 303(d).(3) Are on a plan of supervision or suspended, pending investigation of recipient abuse.(4) Have been terminated from the facility or temporary health care services agency as the result of alleged or substantiated recipient abuse.(5) Are under investigation by law enforcement for an alleged crime against a recipient.(6) Have been convicted of a crime against a recipient.(d) Content of profiles.--(1) Each profile shall include:(i) The following personal information:(A) Full legal name.(B) The last four digits of the individual's Social Security number.(C) Age.(D) Race.(E) Sex.(F) Home address.(G) Current or former employee job title.(H) A recent photograph.(ii) A notation indicating:(A) Each criterion under subsection (c) that applies to the individual.(B) For criteria under subsection (c)(1), (3) and (5), the current status of the investigations.20260SB0807PN1823 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Next to the associated criteria listed, if there was a finding of a false report under subsection (e)(2)(ii).(D) If an appeal is filed under subsection (h), "Appeal pending" until the appeal process is concluded.(iii) The date or dates associated with each criteria listed.(iv) The county in which the alleged or substantiated recipient abuse or crime against a recipient occurred.(2) Final dispositions and report statuses must remain on a profile permanently, unless the finding was made in error, the individual was found not guilty in a court of competent jurisdiction or the department is notified of the individual's death.(e) Case files and access.--(1) The registry shall include a permanent case file, which shall only be accessible by the department, for an individual who is the subject of any of the following:(i) A protective services report made under section 302(a).(ii) A substantiated report under section 303(d).(iii) An unsubstantiated report made under section 303.(iv) A report to law enforcement officials relating to recipient abuse:(A) Under section 701(b).(B) Made by a department, agency, facility or temporary health care services agency about an 20260SB0807PN1823 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employee.(C) Made by an individual.(v) A court record associated with an arrest for a crime against a recipient. The status of a criminal proceeding brought on the basis of a report under subsection (c).(vi) A disciplinary action taken by facilities or temporary health care service agencies against the individual for alleged or substantiated recipient abuse.(2) The case file shall include:(i) The source of each report or record.(ii) False reports of recipient abuse or crimes where the victim is a recipient pursuant to a conviction under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) or 4906 (relating to false reports to law enforcement authorities) for the purpose of identifying and tracking patterns of intentionally making false reports relating to recipient abuse.(iii) A record of any request to release, amend or expunge information retained by the department or appeal made by an individual on the registry.(iv) Final and binding disciplinary actions taken by a facility, temporary health care services agency, agency or department against the individual, including imposition of probationary or other conditions related to employment.(f) Mandatory reporting and time requirements.--(1) Each facility, temporary health care services agency, agency, law enforcement official and court shall submit the names of individuals who meet the criteria under 20260SB0807PN1823 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (e)(1) to the department within 48 hours of creation of a report or record, taking disciplinary action, opening a criminal investigation or arrest for or conviction of a crime against a recipient as provided for under subsection (e)(1).(2) Within five days of receipt of a submission under paragraph (1), the department shall create a case file and, if applicable, a profile on the registry for the subject of the report or record.(g) Notification.--(1) If an individual meets the criteria for placement of a profile on the registry under subsection (c), the department shall notify the individual and the individual's legal counsel, if applicable, within five days of the individual's profile being placed on the registry that the individual's name has been placed on the registry and provide the form described under paragraph (2) by:(i) certified and registered mail; and(ii) if electronic contact information is available, electronically.(2) Upon receipt of notification under paragraph (1), the individual must provide and verify to the department the information required under subsection (d)(1)(i) on a form prescribed by the department within five days of receipt of the form. The form prescribed by the department shall include a statement that a false statement made by an individual on the form is punishable under the applicable provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49 (relating to falsification and intimidation).(3) Once an individual's profile is placed on the registry, the department shall notify the following of the 20260SB0807PN1823 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual's placement on the registry:(i) The administrator of the facility or temporary health care services agency where the individual was most recently employed.(ii) The administrator of the facility, temporary health care services agency or agency who reported the recipient abuse.(iii) Except for an individual under subparagraph (i) or (ii), the individual who reported the recipient abuse.(iv) The older adult or guardian of the older adult who was the victim of recipient abuse or crime against a recipient.(h) Appeals.--(1) An individual notified of placement of a profile on the registry under subsection (g)(1) may appeal the placement within 90 days of the date of the notification.(2) If an individual placed on the registry files an appeal within 90 days of notification of the placement, the department shall review the placement within 60 days of the filing date of the appeal, unless the individual waives the administrative review process.(3) After administrative review, the appeal shall be conducted as provided under 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(4) The department shall notify the individual and the individual's legal counsel, if applicable, of the determination of the appeal:20260SB0807PN1823 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) by certified and registered mail; and(ii) if electronic contact information is available, by electronic mail.(5) If an appeal is granted, the department must remove the appealed information on the profile or, if applicable, the individual's profile from the registry and notify the individual of the removal with five days of the final determination.(i) Additional duties.--(1) Each individual on the registry shall:(i) Notify the department of a change of home address of the individual within 10 days of moving out of the home address listed on the registry.(ii) Annually attest, on a form prescribed by the department, to the accuracy of the information under subsection (d)(1) and submit a photo of the individual taken in the last 30 days on a form prescribed by the department. The form prescribed by the department shall include a statement that a false statement made by an individual on the form is punishable under the applicable provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49.(2) The department shall:(i) Verify the information attested to under paragraph (1)(ii).(ii) Establish a procedure by which an individual may send an electronic request to the department to review a summary of information on the profile for the sole purpose of ensuring that an individual being considered for employment or employed by the applicant to provide care to an older adult not associated with a 20260SB0807PN1823 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility or temporary health care services agency does not have a profile on the registry.(iii) Require each applicant under subparagraph (ii) to sign an attestation on a form prescribed by the department stating that the information requested is for the sole purpose of ensuring that an individual being considered for employment or employed by the applicant to provide care to an older adult not associated with a facility or temporary health care services agency does not have a profile on the registry. The form prescribed by the department shall include a statement that a false statement made by an individual on the form is punishable under the applicable provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49.Section 903. Prohibitions and requirements.(a) Prohibition and requirements for facilities and temporary health care services agencies.--Beginning upon the establishment of the registry, a facility or a temporary health care services agency:(1) prior to employing an individual, shall access the registry to determine if the individual has a profile on the registry;(2) shall access the registry to determine if individuals currently employed have a profile on the registry; and(3) may not employ or otherwise engage individuals who have a profile on the registry.(b) Requirements for employees and prospective employees.--Beginning on the effective date of this subsection and prior to the establishment of the registry, the administrator of a facility or a temporary health care services agency shall 20260SB0807PN1823 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 require current and prospective employees to sign an attestation on a form prescribed by the department stating that the information provided to the administrator by the individual is true and complete and that the individual does not meet any of the criteria under section 902(c). The form prescribed by the department shall include a statement that a false statement made by an individual on the form is punishable under the applicable provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49 (relating to falsification and intimidation).Section 904. Penalties.(a) Facilities and temporary health care services agencies.--The department may issue an order assessing a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 to a facility or a temporary health care services agency owner or administrator that intentionally or willfully fails to comply with or obstructs compliance with this chapter or that intimidates or commits a retaliatory act against an employee who complies in good faith with this chapter.(b) Individuals on registry.--(1) The department may issue an order assessing a civil penalty to an individual who intentionally or willfully fails to comply with the provisions of section 902(i)(1)(i) as follows:(i) $100 for noncompliance for 60 days or less.(ii) $500 for noncompliance for more than 60 days but less than 180 days.(2) An individual who intentionally or willfully fails to comply with the provisions of section 902(i)(1)(i) for more than 180 days or provides false information to the department under section 902(i)(1)(i) commits a misdemeanor 20260SB0807PN1823 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the second degree and shall be sentenced to pay a fine of $1,000 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(c) Applicable provisions.--An order under this section is subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies).Section 905. Temporary regulations.(a) Authority.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this chapter, the department shall promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The department may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration.--The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (a) shall expire six months after the effective date of this section. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.Section 8. The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, shall not apply to the provisions of Chapter 9 of the act.20260SB0807PN1823 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 9. This act shall apply to contracts entered into before, on or after the effective date of this section.Section 10. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB0807PN1823 - 16 - 123